Massachusetts, session 194th, H3975.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
(a) There shall be a special commission established to study and implement a solution for
the removal of double utility poles in the commonwealth that occurs when a replacement utility
pole is built alongside an existing utility pole and neither the replacement utility pole nor the
existing utility pole is removed. The commission shall consist of the following 6 members: (i)
the secretary of the office of energy and environmental affairs or the secretary's designee, who
shall serve as chair; (ii) a representative from the Massachusetts Department of Transportation;
(iii) a representative from the Massachusetts Municipal Association, Inc.; (iv) a representative
from Eversource Energy; (v) a representative from National Grid; and (vi) a representative from
Unitil Resources, Inc.
of 2

(b) The study shall include, but not be limited to:
(i) assessments on the current state of double utility poles in the commonwealth;
(ii) identification of any possible legal, financial and regulatory barriers involving the
removal of double utility poles;
(iii) recommendations for legislation on removal of double utility poles;
(iv) analysis on the economic implications of removing double utility poles in the
commonwealth;
(v) proposals on funding for the removal of double utility poles; and
(vi) establishing best practices and procedures for the removal of double utility poles.
(c) The commission shall prepare a report on its activities and on any findings and
recommendations. Not later than December 31, 2026, the report shall be submitted to the: (i)
chairs of the joint committee on telecommunications, utilities and energy; (ii) chairs of the joint
committee on transportation; (iii) chairs of the senate and house committees on ways and means;
and (iv) offices of the house and senate clerk.
of 2